Utah statutes.
75-7-1001.   Remedies for breach of trust.

(1)  A violation by a trustee of a duty the trustee owes to a beneficiary is a breach of trust.

(2)  To remedy a breach of trust that has occurred or may occur, the court may:

(a)  compel the trustee to perform the trustee's duties;

(b)  enjoin the trustee from committing a breach of trust;

(c)  compel the trustee to redress a breach of trust by paying money, restoring property, or other means;

(d)  order a trustee to account;

(e)  appoint a special fiduciary to take possession of the trust property and administer the trust;

(f)  suspend the trustee;

(g)  remove the trustee as provided in Section 75-7-706;

(h)  reduce or deny compensation to the trustee;

(i)  subject to Section 75-7-1012, void an act of the trustee, impose a lien or a constructive trust on trust property, or trace trust property wrongfully disposed of and recover the property or its proceeds; or

(j)  order any other appropriate relief.

